Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2208
Interim receipts; exchangeable for definitive bonds; mutilated, destroyed, stolen, or lost; replacement; security.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the commission may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The commission may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed, stolen or lost. In so replacing any bonds, the commission shall take adequate security to protect against any loss which might be incurred as a result thereof.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 8, p. 1109.